Louisiana, session 2026, HB193.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1125.1(B)(1)(introductory paragraph) and (2) are hereby amended
and reenacted to read as follows:
§1125.1. Louisiana Sickle Cell Commission
* * *
B.(1) Thirteen members shall be appointed by the governor, subject to
Senate confirmation, as follows: The following members shall be appointed by the
governor and subject to Senate confirmation:
* * *
(2)(a) Two of the members shall be as follows: The following shall be
members of the commission:
(a) (i) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health or his designee.
(b) (ii) The Medicaid director of the Louisiana Department of Health or his
designee.
(iii) The executive director of the Sickle Cell Association of South Louisiana
or his designee.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 193 ENROLLED
(iv) The executive director of the Northeast Louisiana Sickle Cell Anemia
Technical Resource Foundation, Inc. or his designee.
(v) The executive director of the Sickle Cell Disease Association of
America, Inc., Northwest Louisiana Chapter or his designee.
(vi) The executive director of the Sickle Cell Anemia Research Foundation,
Alexandria or his designee.
(vii) The executive director of Southwest Louisiana Sickle Cell Anemia, Inc.
or his designee.
(b) Any member organization provided for in Items (iii) through (vii) of this
Subparagraph shall only serve on the commission if the organization has at least one
healthcare professional on the organization's governance board.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 40:1125.1(B)(1)(d) through (h) and (10) are hereby repealed in their
entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.